Massachusetts, session 194th, S1630.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Mass General Laws Chapter 111, Section 8C is hereby amended by inserting at the end
the following:-- "Any town, city or district with artificial fluoridation programs in effect can end
those programs with a local ordinance banning fluoridation via the local legislative body, i.e.
City Council, Town Meeting or Water Commissioners. That process is initiated by the
presentation of a petition of at least ten registered voters to the legislative body. Moreover, if the
water superintendent or water commissioners with responsibility for ensuring water safety
determines that in their opinion, the water fluoridation program is posing a risk to consumers,
workers, infrastructure or environment, they can suspend fluoridation programs at will."
of 1